Alabama, session 2026rs, HB473.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF ALABAMA:
Section 1. Section 29-4-4, Code of Alabama 1975, is
amended to read as follows:
"§29-4-4
(a) Unless provided otherwise by law or applicable
legislative rule or policy, security personnel employed by the
House of Representatives and the Senate shall be responsible
Page 1

House of Representatives and the Senate shall be responsible
HB473 INTRODUCED
for the security of all of the following:
(1) The third, fourth, fifth, sixth, seventh, and
eighth floors of the Alabama State House located at 11 South
Union Street, such other areas within the Alabama State House
as which are occupied or used by the Legislature, and such
additional areas outside the Alabama State House in accordance
with Section 29-1-19.
(2) The new Alabama State House, as coordinated by the
Secretary of the Legislative Council, the Secretary of the
Senate, and the Clerk of the House of Representatives.
(3) The legislative parking deck and park located
between South Union Street and the new Alabama State House.
(4) During any official legislative event, as
designated by the President Pro Tempore of the Senate and
Speaker of the House of Representatives in coordination with
the Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency, held in the State of
Alabama away from the Capitol complex.
(b) The security officers employed under this chapter
shall have the powers of peace officers in this state and may
exercise those powers only in the areas designated in
subsection (a).
(c) The Alabama State Law Enforcement Agency, in
coordination with the Legislative Council, shall be
responsible for the security of the perimeter and points of
entry to the Alabama State House and new Alabama State House
as prescribed by the Legislative Council.
(d)(1) Every department, agency, and bureau of the
State of Alabama shall assist in any manner requested by the
Page 2

State of Alabama shall assist in any manner requested by the
HB473 INTRODUCED
Legislature in assuring the security of the areas of the
Alabama State House designated in subsection (a).
(2) Subsection (c) shall apply to any convening of the
Legislature outside of the Capitol or away from the Alabama
State House in accordance with Sections 48 or 48.01 of the
Constitution of Alabama of 2022, or other applicable law.
(e) For purposes of this section, "new Alabama State
House" means the building bounded by Pelham Street, South
Jackson Street, and Washington Avenue in Montgomery."
Section 2. This act shall become effective on October
1, 2026.
Page 3